Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.60.167

Voter signature verification—Forms.

The secretary of state shall design forms for voters to use in completing incomplete ballot declarations and forms to be used by voters in updating a voter's signature in the county's registration files in the various languages required of state agencies. The forms must include the oath and warning language used on voter registration forms. Each county auditor shall provide these forms on the auditor's website and in the auditor's office.

[ 2024 c 269 s 4.]